Maine, session 132, LD1719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 456, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. The following provisions govern the process for initiating a request to transfer a
student from one school administrative unit to another and the process by which a
superintendent may approve or deny a request and give notice of the superintendent's
decision.
(1) A student's parent may request to transfer the student from one school
administrative unit to another at any point in the school year if the transfer request
is for the current school year. A student's parent may not submit a request before
April 15th if the parent is requesting that the student be transferred to another
school administrative unit for the following school year.
(2) A transfer request must be initiated by submitting a request to the
superintendent of the school administrative unit where the student resides. The
superintendent receiving a transfer request shall consult with the superintendent of
the school administrative unit to which the student's parent is requesting the student
be transferred before either superintendent decides to approve or deny the request.
Each superintendent shall make a determination within 30 calendar days of
receiving a transfer request.
(3) A superintendent may approve the transfer of a student from one school
administrative unit to another if the superintendent finds that the transfer is in the
best interest of the student and the school community.
(4) A transfer request is not approved unless both superintendents approve the
request.
(5) If approved, the transfer takes effect for the entirety of the school year. If during
the school year there is a change of circumstances unrelated to the original transfer
request and the parent and both superintendents agree that reversing the transfer is
in the best interest of the student and school communities, the transfer must be
reversed.
(6) The superintendents shall notify the commissioner of any transfer approved
under this paragraph.
(7) Each superintendent shall provide to the parent of the student requesting a
transfer under this paragraph a written description of the basis of that
superintendent's determination and documentation of the process taken to reach
that determination.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2013, c. 456, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. If a transfer request made under paragraph A-1 is denied, the parent of the student
requesting the transfer may, within 15 calendar days of receiving notice of a
superintendent's determination, request that the commissioner review the
Page 1 - 132LR1437(01)

413 determination. Upon a timely request made pursuant to this paragraph, the
424 commissioner shall review the determination as follows.
(1) If only one superintendent has denied the transfer request, the commissioner
shall review whether the transfer is in the best interest of the student and school
community and whether the process described in paragraph A-1 was followed. The
commissioner shall review the superintendents' determinations and may
communicate with the superintendents and with the parent of the student prior to
making a decision. The commissioner may approve or deny the transfer and shall
provide to the parent of the student and to the superintendents a written decision
describing the basis of the commissioner's determination. A parent of the student
requesting the transfer and either superintendent involved in the transfer request
may request a review of the commissioner's determination as follows.
If dissatisfied with the commissioner's decision, a parent of the student requesting
a transfer or either superintendent may, within 15 calendar days of notification of
the commissioner's decision, request that the state board review the transfer to
ensure the process was followed with respect to the determinations made by the
superintendents pursuant to paragraph A-1 and the review performed by the
commissioner pursuant to this subparagraph. The state board shall review
documentation from each superintendent and the commissioner outlining the
process each individual used for deciding to approve or deny the transfer. The state
board shall, within 45 calendar days of receiving the request, determine whether
the appropriate processes were followed. The state board shall provide to the
parent of the student, the superintendents and the commissioner a written decision
describing the basis of the state board's determination.
(a) If the state board determines that the superintendents and the commissioner
followed the appropriate processes, the state board shall uphold the
commissioner's decision. The state board's decision is final and binding.
(b) If the state board determines that either superintendent or the commissioner
did not follow the appropriate process, the superintendents shall revisit the
transfer request within 30 calendar days and issue a new determination with
documentation showing the process was followed. The state board shall
review the process that was followed to issue the new determination, and if the
state board determines that the process required of the superintendents as
described in paragraph A-1 was not followed, the state board may decide to
overturn the superintendents' determination based on the facts of the case. The
state board's decision is final and binding.
(2) If both superintendents have denied the transfer request, the commissioner shall
review only whether the process described in paragraph A-1 was followed.
(a) If the commissioner determines that the process was followed, the transfer
request is denied. This determination is final and binding.
(b) If the commissioner determines that the process was not followed, the
superintendents shall revisit the transfer request within 30 calendar days of
notification from the commissioner. Each superintendent shall issue a new
determination to the parent with documentation showing the process was
followed.
Page 2 - 132LR1437(01)

Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶F, as amended by PL 2013, c. 456, §3, is
repealed.